North Carolina statutes. Chapter 53. Regulation of Financial Services.
Article 13. Conservation of Bank Assets and Issuance of Preferred Stock. [Repealed]

§§ 53-148 through 53-158.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012.

History.

S. 53-148; 1933, c. 155, s. 1; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-149; 1933, c. 155, s. 2; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-150; 1933, c. 155, s. 3; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-151; 1933, c. 155, s. 4; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-152; 1933, c. 155, s. 5; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-153; 1933, c. 155, s. 6; 1995, c. 129, s. 28; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-154; 1933, c. 155, s. 7; 1979, c. 483, s. 16; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-155; 1933, c. 155, s. 8; 1979, c. 483, s. 17; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-156; 1933, c. 155, s. 9; 1935, c. 80; 1953, c. 675, s. 5; 1979, c. 483, s. 18; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-157; 1933, c. 155, s. 10; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-158; 1933, c. 155, s. 11; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-158.1; 2005-269, s. 19; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012.

§§ 53-158.2 through 53-158.9.

Reserved for future codification purposes.